Massachusetts, session 194th, H5484.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Notwithstanding any General or Special Law to the contrary, including but not
limited to any General or Special Law conferring exclusive authority upon the Department of
Agriculture to regulate and control the application of fertilizers elsewhere in the Commonwealth,
the application of fertilizer containing nitrogen or phosphorus, or any other pollutants in the
Town of Eastham is prohibited, except for commercial agricultural purposes and the residential
use of organic fertilizer with low nitrogen and phosphorus for use in growing fruits and
vegetables.
Section 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1